South Dakota, session 2026, HB1047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. The Department of Game, Fish and Parks may contract for the construction,
reconstruction, renovation, and modernization of infrastructure at Blue Dog State Fish
Hatchery, together with furnishings and equipment, including heating, air conditioning,
plumbing, water, sewer, electric facilities, refrigeration, laboratories, sidewalks, parking,
landscaping, architectural and engineering services, and other services or actions as may be
required to accomplish the project for an estimated cost of $8,000,000.
Section 2. There is appropriated $3,500,000 in federal fund expenditure authority and
$4,500,000 in other fund expenditure authority, to the Department of Game, Fish and Parks,
for the project in section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. The secretary of the Department of Game, Fish and Parks shall approve vouchers
and the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 4. The administration of the design and construction of the project authorized in this
Act shall be under the general charge and supervision of the Bureau of Human Resources and
Administration as provided in chapter 5-14.
Section 5. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Section 6. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in
full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.

26.568.10 2 1047
An Act to make an appropriation for the construction costs at the Blue Dog State Fish
Hatchery, and to declare an emergency.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1047
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1047 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1047 ENROLLED